Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.46.080

Request for review of action—Stay of action—Orders subject to review.

(1) During the period of the supervisory direction or period of conservatorship, as applicable, the state trust company may request the director to review an action taken or proposed to be taken by a representative under a supervisory directive or by the conservator, specifying that the action complained of is believed not to be in the best interest of the state trust company.

(2) A request made under subsection (1) of this section shall stay the action of the representative or conservator pending review of such action by the director.

(3) An order by the director pursuant to this section, following the review of an action or proposed action of the representative or conservator, shall be subject to judicial review in accordance with RCW 30B.10.180.

[ 2019 c 389 s 87.]